Nebraska, session 109, LB254.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB254 LB254
2025 2025
Section 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to transfer twenty-
five million dollars from the General Fund for fiscal year 2025-26 to the
Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund and twenty-five million dollars
from the General Fund for fiscal year 2026-27 to the Rural Workforce
Housing Investment Fund to provide workforce housing grants under the
Rural Workforce Housing Investment Act.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-